Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2742
Civil actions; applicability of act.

(1) The County Court Expedited Civil Actions Act applies to civil actions in county court in which the sole relief sought is a money judgment and in which the claim of each plaintiff is less than or equal to the county court jurisdictional amount set forth in subdivision (5) of section 24-517, including damages of any kind, penalties, interest accrued before the filing date, and attorney's fees, but excluding prejudgment interest accrued after the filing date, postjudgment interest, and costs.

(2) The act does not apply to Small Claims Court actions or domestic relations matters or paternity or custody determinations as defined in section 25-2740.

(3) For the purposes of the act, side means all litigants with generally common interests in the litigation.

Laws 2020, LB912, § 2.